Wyoming statutes. Title 9 Administration of the Government
Article 7. Investment of State Funds
§ 9-4-721.
Investment funds committee; selection panel.

There is created the selection panel to appoint voting members to the investment funds committee as provided in W.S.

9-4-720

. The panel consists of five (5) members composed of one (1) member appointed by each of the members of the board. Each selection panel member shall possess financial knowledge and experience to qualify them for the position. Once appointed, a selection panel member shall serve for the term of office of the board member who appointed them but may be removed by the appointing board member.

The selection panel shall research and interview candidates for the investment funds committee. The selection panel shall solicit nominations for candidates for the investment funds committee from the state treasurer’s office, other members of the investment funds committee, other appropriate entities and the board. Interested persons may apply directly to the panel.

No candidate shall be appointed by the selection panel to the investment funds committee unless the candidate has all of the following qualifications:

Not less than seven (7) years of institutional investment experience involved in the management of a portfolio in excess of five hundred million dollars ($500,000,000.00);

A broad understanding of financial markets;

Not been convicted of or pleads guilty or nolo contendere to a felony violation or been the subject of any disciplinary action involving moral turpitude;

No conflicts of interest that would lead to a violation of W.S.

6-5-106

,

6-5-118

,

16-6-118

or other comparable provision of law.

Staff and support for the selection panel shall be provided by the office of the state treasurer. Members of the panel who are not employees or elected officials of the state of Wyoming shall receive per diem and travel expense reimbursement in the manner and amount prescribed for legislators under W.S.

28-5-101

.

History.

2017 ch. 202, § 1, effective March 13, 2017; 2020 ch. 82, § 2, effective March 13, 2020.

The 2020 amendment,

in (b) substituted “The selection panel shall solicit nominations for candidates” for “Candidates” and “committee from the state treasurer's office, other members of the investment funds committee, other appropriate entities and the board. Interested persons may apply” for “committee may be nominated by the board or may apply.”

Laws 2020, ch. 82, § 5, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 13, 2020.